Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2618
Use tax; delinquent; penalty.

If the tax provided for in section 77-2616 is not paid within such time as may be prescribed for payment thereof by rules and regulations prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, the same shall become delinquent and a penalty of twenty-five percent shall be added thereto, together with interest at the rate specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted, until paid. If attorneys are employed to collect such delinquent tax, ten percent of the tax, penalty, and interest shall be added thereto as a part of the costs of collection.

Laws 1949, c. 224, § 3, p. 629;

Laws 1981, LB 167, § 50;

Laws 1992, Fourth Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 21.